Georgia, session 2025_26, HB587.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to reincorporate the City of Cartersville in the County of Bartow, approved
March 28, 1974 (Ga. L. 1974, p. 3697), as amended, is amended by revising Section 3.08 as
follows:
H. B. 587
- 1 -

LC 62 0109/AP
"SECTION 3.08.
City clerk.
(a) The mayor and council shall appoint a city clerk. He or she shall be responsible for
keeping and preserving the city seal and all records of council, attending meetings of the
council and keeping a journal of its proceedings at such meetings, including the names of
members present and absent, the vote of each member on each question, each motion
considered, a proper index of such proceedings, and the title of each resolution or
ordinance considered; preparing and certifying copies of official records in his or her
office, for which fees may be prescribed by ordinance; and performing such other duties
as may be required by the city council.
(b) The city council shall require the clerk, before entering upon the discharge of his or her
duties, to give a good and sufficient bond in an amount to be decided by the city council,
but not less than $100,000.00, said bond payable to the City of Cartersville, for the faithful
performance of his or her duties and to secure against corruption, malfeasance,
misappropriations, or unlawful expenditures. Said surety bond shall be obtained from a
surety company licensed to do business in the State of Georgia, City of Cartersville, and
the premium thereon shall be paid by the city.
(c) The city council shall also appoint a deputy city clerk, who shall discharge the duties
of the city clerk in his or her absence, and shall have other such duties as may be
designated by the city council."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by adding a new section to read as follows:
H. B. 587
- 2 -

LC 62 0109/AP
"SECTION 3.13.
Finance director.
The mayor and city council shall approve the appointment of the finance director in the
same manner as for all other city department heads. The finance director shall be the ex
officio treasurer and shall also keep a true and accurate account of the receipts and
expenditures of the city. The city council shall require the finance director, before entering
upon the discharge of his or her duties, to give a good and sufficient bond in an amount to
be decided by the city council, but not less than $100,000.00, said bond payable to the City
of Cartersville, for the faithful performance of his or her duties and to secure against
corruption, malfeasance, misappropriations, or unlawful expenditures. Said surety bond
shall be obtained from a surety company licensed to do business in the State of Georgia,
City of Cartersville, and the premium thereon shall be paid by the city."
SECTION 3.
Said Act is further amended by adding a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 6.08.
Technology fee.
(a) The clerk of the Municipal Court of the City of Cartersville is hereby authorized to
charge and collect a technology fee as a surcharge to each criminal and quasi-criminal fine
paid. The technology fee shall be set by order of the judge of the court, provided that the
fee shall not exceed $20.00.
(b) The fee authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall be used exclusively to provide
for the following technological needs of the court and the city's police department:
H. B. 587
- 3 -

LC 62 0109/AP
(1) The purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware and
software;
(2) The purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of equipment and software used
for imaging, scanning, facsimile, communications, projections, and printing; and
(3) The purchase of body-worn cameras.
(c) All funds collected pursuant to this Act shall be maintained in a segregated account by
the chief financial officer of the city and clerk of court, separate from other funds of the
city, and shall be expended only for the authorized purposes provided in this section upon
direction of the city manager. The funds may be used to reimburse the city's information
technology department for services provided to the court or police department.
(d) The authorization in subsection (a) of this Act to charge and collect a technology fee
shall expire on July 1, 2030, unless prior to such date the governing authority of the City
of Cartersville enacts an ordinance renewing such authorization for a further five-year
period. The governing authority of the City of Cartersville may further renew such
authorization for subsequent five-year periods through the adoption of subsequent
ordinances."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 587
- 4 -